ArabIPA.lexd
PATTERNS
IPA2Arab+

LEXICON IPA2Arab
a:ا # TODO
b:ب
ɓ:ٻ
p:پ
t:ت
ʈ:ٹ
s:ث
dʒ:ج
ʄ:ڄ
tʃ:چ
ɦ:ح
x:خ
d:د
ɖ:ڈ
ᶑ:ݙ
z:ذ # TODO
r:ر
ɽ:ڑ
z:ز # TODO
ʒ:ژ
s:س
ʃ:ش
s:ص
z:ض
t:ط
z:ظ
a:ع # TODO
ɣ:غ
f:ف
q:ق
k:ک
g:گ
ɠ:ڳ
l:ل
m:م
n:ن
̃:ں
̃:٘
̃:٘
ɳ:ݨ
v:و
ɦ:ہ
ʰ:ھ # TODO: or ʱ
j:ی # TODO: or i
e:ے
ɓ:ٻ
iʔ:ئ # ???
aʔ:ؤ
aː:آ

# punctuation
,:،
؟:?
